Nebraska, session 109, LB960.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB960 LB960
2026 2026
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to promote civic
engagement leadership development, and student voice by providing for
student members on school boards.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 1 to 5 of this act:
(1) High school means a school operated by a school district to
educate students in at least grades ten through twelve and from which
such students may graduate;
(2) School board has the same meaning as in section 79-101;
(3) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101; and
(4) Student school board member means a high school student duly
selected pursuant to section 3 of this act to serve as a nonvoting member
of a school board in an advisory capacity.
Sec. 3. (1) Each school board shall include student school board
members on the school board in a number equal to the number of elected
school board members on such school board.
(2) Student school board members shall be selected from high schools
in the school district as follows:
(a) If the school district has only one high school, all student
school board members shall be selected from the high school;
(b) If the number of high schools operated by the school district
equals the number of elected school board members, one student from each
high school shall be selected as a student school board member; and
(c) For all other school districts, the school board shall adopt
procedures for determining which high schools will have a student
selected as a school board member for each school year such that the same
number of student school board members are selected from each high school
over a designated period of years.
(3) Each school board shall adopt procedures to select student
school board members from the high schools determined pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section. The selection procedures may include, but
are not limited to, student elections, principal nominations, or
-2-

LB960 LB960
2026 2026
applications and interviews. Any student selected to serve as a student
school board member shall, at the beginning of the student's term as a
student school board member, be enrolled in good standing in grade ten,
eleven, or twelve at the high school from which the student was selected.
(4) Each student school board member shall serve a one-year term.
Each school board shall determine if, and in what circumstances, a
student may serve more than one term as a student school board member and
shall determine the beginning date of the term for the initial student
school board members except that such date shall be no later than the
first day of the 2027-28 school year.
Sec. 4. (1) Each student school board member shall:
(a) Attend all public meetings of the school board;
(b) Receive meeting materials and agendas for all public meetings of
the school board;
(c) Be seated with the school board at all public meetings of the
school board and be included in all public discussions of the school
board;
(d) Serve as a liaison between the student body and the school
board; and
(e) Be permitted to introduce and advocate for agenda items except
that a school board may, as part of the school board's policies and
procedures, require sponsorship from an elected school board member for
the introduction of an agenda item.
(2) No student school board member shall:
(a) Vote on matters before the school board;
(b) Attend or participate in closed or executive sessions of the
school board; or
(c) Access confidential student, personnel, or legal information.
Sec. 5. On or before January 1, 2027, each school board shall adopt
policies and procedures for student school board members to serve on the
school board in accordance with sections 1 to 5 of this act. Such
-3-

LB960 LB960
2026 2026
policies and procedures may also include, but are not limited to,
provisions for training, transportation, recognition, and evaluation of
student board members.
-4-